Utah statutes.
63G-6-404.   Preference for providers of state products.
(1) (a)  All public procurement units shall, in all purchases of goods,
supplies, equipment, materials, and printing, give a reciprocal preference to
those bidders offering goods, supplies, equipment, materials, or printing
produced, manufactured, mined, grown, or performed in Utah as against those
bidders offering goods, supplies, equipment, materials, or printing produced,
manufactured, mined, grown, or performed in any state that gives or requires a
preference to goods, supplies, equipment, materials, or printing produced,
manufactured, mined, grown, or performed in that state.
(b)  The amount of reciprocal preference shall be equal to the amount of the
preference applied by the other state for that particular good, supply,
equipment, material, or printing.
(c) (i)  The bidder shall certify on the bid that the goods, supplies,
equipment, materials, or printing offered are produced, manufactured, mined,
grown, or performed in Utah.
(ii)  The reciprocal preference is waived if that certification does not
appear on the bid.
(2) (a)  If the bidder submitting the lowest responsive and responsible bid
offers goods, supplies, equipment, materials, or printing produced,
manufactured, mined, grown, or performed in a state that gives or requires a
preference, and if another bidder has submitted a responsive and responsible
bid offering goods, supplies, equipment, materials, or printing produced,
manufactured, mined, grown, or performed in Utah, and with the benefit of the
reciprocal preference, his bid is equal to or less than the original lowest
bid, the procurement officer shall:
(i)  give notice to the bidder offering goods, supplies, equipment, materials,
or printing produced, manufactured, mined, grown, or performed in Utah that
the bidder qualifies as a preferred bidder; and
(ii)  make the purchase from the preferred bidder if, the bidder agrees, in
writing, to meet the low bid within 72 hours after notification that the
bidder is a preferred bidder.
(b)  The procurement officer shall include the exact price submitted by the
lowest bidder in the notice the procurement officer submits to the preferred
bidder.
(c)  The procurement officer may not enter into a contract with any other
bidder for the purchase until 72 hours have elapsed after notification to the
preferred bidder.
(3) (a)  If there is more than one preferred bidder, the procurement officer
shall award the contract to the willing preferred bidder who was the lowest
preferred bidder originally.
(b)  If there were two or more equally low preferred bidders, the procurement
officer shall comply with the rules adopted by the Procurement Policy Board to
determine which bidder should be awarded the contract.
(4)  The provisions of this section do not apply if application of this
section might jeopardize the receipt of federal funds.
